en: Sweet bean paste
ca: Pasta de mongetes
es: Pasta de judía dulce
fr: Pâte de haricots
hr: pasta od slatkog graha
it: Pasta di fagioli
ja: 餡, こしあん, あん, あんこ, つぶあん
jv: Pasta kacang legi
ko: 콩소
pa: ਮਿੱਠੀ ਬੀਨ ਦਾ ਪੇਸਟ
zh: 豆沙

en: cowpea, cowpeas
ar: لوبياء ظفرية
bg: Папуда
bn: বিউলির ডাল
de: Augenbohne
dv: ރިހަ ތޮޅި
el: Αμπελοφάσουλο
eo: Okulvigno
es: feijão-frade
fa: لوبیا چشم‌بلبلی
fi: Lehmänpapu
fr: niébé, voème
gu: ચોળા
he: לוביה
hi: लोबिया
hr: kravlji grah
hu: tehénborsó
is: Augnbaun
it: fagiolo dall'occhio
ja: ササゲ
jv: Polong sapi
ka: ძაძა
ko: 동부 (식물)
la: vigna unguiculata, Vigna catjang
mg: Voanemba
ml: വൻപയർ
ne: बोडी
pa: ਲੋਬੀਆ
pl: Wspięga wężowata
ru: Коровий горох
rw: Igishyimbo
sg: Gbari
si: කව්පි
sn: Nyemba
sr: Крављи грашак
sv: Ögonböna
sw: Mkunde
ta: காராமணி
te: అలసంద
tl: Paayap
tr: Börülce
uk: Вігна китайська
vi: Đậu dải
zh: 豇豆

en: pea, peas
am: ኣተር
ar: بازلاء
az: Əkin noxudu
be: гарох пасяўны
bg: грах
bn: মটরশুঁটি
bo: བོད་སྲན།
br: Piz-bihan
bs: Grašak
ca: pèsol, pèsols
co: Piseddu
cs: hrách
cv: Пăрçа
cy: Pysen
da: Ært
de: Erbse, Erbsen, junge Erbsen
dv: ފެހި އޮށް
el: αρακάς
eo: pizo
es: guisante, arveja, arvejas
et: hernes, herned
eu: Ilar
fa: نخود فرنگی
fi: herne, herneet
fr: pois
fy: eart
ga: Pis
gd: Peasair
gl: Chícharo
gn: Kumanda
gu: વટાણા
he: אפונה
hi: मटर
hr: grašak, graška
ht: Pwa
hu: Borsó
hy: ոլոռ
id: Ercis
io: Pizo
is: Gráerta
it: Pisello, piselli
ja: エンドウ
ka: ბარდა
kk: Бұршақ
km: مَٹَر
kn: ಬಟಾಣಿ
ko: 완두
ku: Baqilê xatûnî
la: pisum sativum
li: ert
ln: Wandu
lt: Žirnis
lv: zirņi
mk: Грашок
ml: പട്ടാണിപ്പയർ
mn: Вандуй
mr: वाटाणा
ms: kacang putih
nb: ert, erter
ne: केराउ
nl: erwt, erwten
nn: ert, erter
oc: Pese
or: ମଟର
os: Тымбылхъæдур
pa: ਮਟਰ
pl: Groch zwyczajny, groszek, groszku
pt: Ervilha, ervilhas
qu: Allwirha
ru: горох
rw: Ishaza
sa: हरेणुः
sd: مٽر
se: Earta
sh: Grašak
sk: hrášok, Hrach siaty
sl: Grah
sq: Bizelja
sr: грашак
su: Kacang polong
sv: ärt, ärta, ärter, ärtor
sw: Njegere
ta: பட்டாணி
te: బఠానీ
th: ถั่วลันเตา
tl: Tsitsaro
to: Pī
tr: Bezelye
tt: Борчак
uk: горох
ur: مٹر
vi: Đậu Hà Lan
za: Duhlanhdouq
zh: 豌豆

en: yellow pea
de: Palerbse, Palerbsen
fr: pois jaune, pois jaunes
it: pisello giallo

en: pigeon pea, red gram, pigeon peas, gandules, toor, arhar, gungo peas
la: Cajanus cajan

en: Rice bean
la: Vigna umbellata

en: pink bean, pink beans, habichuelas rosadas
es: habichuelas rosadas

en: chickpea, chickpeas, garbanzo, garbanzo beans, chick pea, chick peas
af: kekerertjie
am: ሽምብራ
ar: حمص شائع
as: বুট
az: qoyunnoxudu
be: нут культурны
bg: нахут
bn: ছোলা
bs: leblebija
ca: cigron, cigrons
cs: cizrna beraní
cy: gwygbysen, gwygbys
da: kikært, kikærter
de: Kichererbse, Kichererbsen
dv: ސަނާ މުގު
el: ρεβίθι, ρεβιθιά, ρεβύθι
es: garbanzo, garbanzos, garbanzo beans
et: kikerhernes
eu: txitxirio
fa: نخود
fi: kikherne, kahviherne
fr: pois chiche, pois chiches
ga: piseánach
gl: garavanzo
gu: ચણા
he: חמצה
hi: चना
hr: slanutak
hu: csicseriborsó
id: kacang arab
io: garbanzo
is: kjúklingabaun
it: cece, ceci
ja: ヒヨコマメ, ひよこ豆
jv: kacang polong
kk: нұт
kn: ಕಡಲೆ
ko: 병아리콩
ku: nok
la: cicer arietinum
lb: käicher
lt: avinžirniai
lv: auna zirņi
mk: леблебија
ml: കടല
ms: kacang kuda
nb: kikert
ne: चना
nl: kikkererwt, kikkererwten
nn: kikert
oc: céser
or: ଚଣା
pa: ਛੋਲੇ
pl: ciecierzyca, ciecierzycy
ps: نخود
pt: grão-de-bico, grãos-de-bico
ro: năut, năut boabe
ru: нут
sa: चणकः
sh: slanutak
si: කඩල
sl: čičerika
so: shunburo
sq: qiqra
sr: леблебија, leblebija, leblebije
sv: kikärt, kikärter, kikärtor
sw: mnjegere mkubwa
ta: கொண்டைக் கடலை
te: శనగలు
tg: нахӯд
th: ถั่วหัวช้าง
tl: garbansos
tr: nohut
tt: бәрән ногыты
uk: нут
ur: چنا
vi: đậu gà
wa: poes d' souke
yi: נאהיט
zh: 鹰嘴豆

en: pedrosillano chickpeas
ca: cigrons pedrosillanos
de: Pedrosillano Kichererbsen
es: Garbanzos pedrosillanos
hr: pedrosillano slanutak
it: ceci pedrosillani
nl: pedrosillano kikkererwten

en: black chickpea, black chickpeas
da: sort kikært, sorte kikærter

en: cooked chickpeas, boiled chickpeas
bg: варен нахут
cs: vařená cizrna
da: kogte kikærter
de: gekochte Kichererbsen, Kichererbsen gekocht
es: garbanzos cocidos
fi: keitetty kikherne
fr: pois chiches cuits
hr: kuhani slanutak
it: ceci cotti
nl: gekookte kikkererwten
nn: Kogte kikærter
pl: ciecierzyca gotowana
pt: Grão-de-bico cozido
ro: năut fiert
sv: kokta kikärter

en: soaked chickpeas
da: udblødte kikærter
de: gequellte Kichererbsen
es: garbanzos remojados
fr: Pois chiches trempés dans l'eau
hr: namočenog slanutka
it: ceci ammollati
nl: gewelde kikkererwten
pl: namoczona ciecierzyca

en: dried chickpea, Bengal gram
cs: sušená cizrna
fr: pois chiche secs
hr: sušeni slanutak
it: ceci secchi

fr: pois chiches secs trempés
nl: geweekte droge kikkererwten

en: rehydrated chickpeas
de: rehydrierte Kichererbsen
fr: pois chiches réhydratés
hr: rehidrirani slanutak
it: ceci reidratati

en: chickpea flour, chick pea flour, gram flour, garbanzo bean flour, besan
ar: طحين حمص
bg: брашно от нахут
bn: বেসন
ca: farina de cigro, farina de cigrons
cs: cizrnová mouka
da: kikærtemel
de: Kichererbsenmehl
el: ρεβυθάλευρο
eo: kikerfaruno
es: harina de garbanzo
eu: txitxirio-irin
fa: آرد نخودچی
fi: kikhernejauho
fr: farine de pois chiche, farine de pois chiches
gu: ચણાનો લોટ
he: קמח חומוס
hi: बेसन
hr: brašno od slanutka
it: farina di ceci
ja: ベサン
jv: glepung gram
kn: ಕಡಲೆ ಹಿಟ್ಟು
ko: 베산
ml: കടലമാവ്
mr: बेसन
nl: kikkererwtenmeel, besan, gram-meel
nn: kikertmel
pa: ਬੇਸਨ
pl: mąka z ciecierzycy
ro: făină de năut
ru: нутовая мука
sa: चणकपिष्टम्
sk: mleté cicerové bôby
sl: čičerikina moka
sv: kikärtsmjöl
ta: கடலை மாவு
te: ఉఇగ్య్ర్త్యె
ur: بیسن یا چنے کا آٹا
zh: 鷹嘴豆粉

en: green peas
bg: зелен грах
da: Grønne ærter
de: grüne Erbsen
es: guisante verde, guisantes verdes
fi: vihreät herneet, vihreä herne
fr: pois vert
hr: grašak zeleni
hu: zöldborsó
it: piselli verde
ja: グリーンピース
kk: көк буршақ
la: Pisum sativum L. subsp. sativum
lt: žalieji žirneliai
lv: zaļie zirnīši
nl: groene erwt, groene erwten
pl: groszek zielony, zielony groszek, groszku zielonego, zielonego groszku, groch zielony
ro: mazăre
ru: Зеленый горошек
sv: gröna ärtor
th: ถั่ว ลันเตา

en: garden peas, English peas
de: Markerbsen, Gartenerbsen, Markerbsenschoten
es: guisantes de jardín
fi: tarhaherne, tarhaherneet
fr: petits pois, petit pois
hr: vrtni grašak
it: pisellini
la: Pisum sativum L. subsp. sativum var. sativum
lv: dārza zirņi
nl: doperwten, doperwt

en: extra fine garden peas
de: Palerbsen sehr fein
es: guisantes extrafinos
fr: petits pois très fins, petits pois extra fins
hr: ekstra fini vrtni grašak
it: piselli extra fini
nl: extra fijne doperwten, erwten zeer fijn

en: sweet peas
fr: petits pois doux, petit pois doux, pois doux
it: pisello dolce
nl: zoete doperwten
sv: söta ärtor